zh-CN: 体育用品 > 户外休闲 > 滑板车 > 电动滑板车部件 > 车轮和轮胎: 电动滑板车轮胎; 电动滑板车内胎; 电动滑板车车轮
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividades recreativas no exterior > Scooters > Peças de scooters elétricas > Rodas e pneus: Pneus de trotineta elétrica; Câmaras de ar de trotineta elétrica; Rodas de trotineta elétrica
fr: Équipements sportifs > Loisirs de plein air > Trottinettes > Pièces de trottinettes électriques > Roues et pneus: Pneus de trottinettes électriques; Chambres à air de trottinettes électriques; Roues de trottinettes électriques
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 室外休閒 > 滑板車 > 電動滑板車零件 > 車輪與輪胎: 電動滑板車輪胎; 電動滑板車內胎; 電動滑板車車輪
nl: Sportartikelen > Buitenrecreatie > Scooterrijden > E-scooters onderdelen > Wielen en banden: Banden voor e-scooters; Binnenbanden voor e-scooters; Wielen voor e-scooters
da: Sportsartikler > Friluftsliv > Løbehjul > Dele til elløbehjul > Hjul og dæk: Dæk til e-løbehjul; Slanger til e-løbehjul; Hjul til e-løbehjul
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Rekreacija na prostem > Skiroji > Deli za e-skiroje > Kolesa in pnevmatike: Gume za e-skiroje; Cevi za e-skiroje; Kolesa za e-skiroje
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Rekreacija na otvorenom > Romobili za vožnju > Dijelovi za električne romobile > Kotači i gume: Gume za električni romobil; Cijevi za električni romobil; Kotači za električni romobil
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Ulkoharrasteet > Potkulaudat > Sähköpotkulautojen osat > Pyörät ja renkaat: Sähköpotkulautojen renkaat; Sähköpotkulautojen sisäkumit; Sähköpotkulautojen pyörät
ja: スポーツ用品 > 屋外レクリエーション > キックスクーター > 電動スクーターパーツ > ホイール・タイヤ: 電動スクーター用タイヤ; 電動スクーター用チューブ; 電動スクーター用ホイール
it: Articoli sportivi > Ricreazione outdoor > Scooter > Parti di scooter elettrici > Ruote e pneumatici: Pneumatici per monopattini elettrici; Camere d'aria per monopattini elettrici; Ruote per monopattini elettrici
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > สันทนาการกลางแจ้ง > สกูทเตอร์สำหรับขับขี่ > ชิ้นส่วนสกู๊ตเตอร์ไฟฟ้า > ล้อและยาง: ยางสกู๊ตเตอร์ไฟฟ้า; ยางในสกู๊ตเตอร์ไฟฟ้า; ล้อสกู๊ตเตอร์ไฟฟ้า
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Giải trí ngoài trời > Xe trượt scooter đạp chân > Phụ tùng xe máy điện > Bánh xe và lốp xe: Lốp xe điện scooter; Săm xe điện scooter; Bánh xe điện scooter
en: Sporting Goods > Outdoor Recreation > Riding Scooters > E-Scooters Parts > Wheels & Tires: E-Scooter Tires; E-Scooter Tubes; E-Scooter Wheels
ko: 스포츠용품 > 야외 레크레이션 > 씽씽이 > 전기 스쿠터 부품 > 휠 및 타이어: 전동 스쿠터 타이어; 전동 스쿠터 튜브; 전동 스쿠터 휠
ru: Спортивные товары > Активный отдых на открытом воздухе > Катание на самокатах > Детали для электросамокатов > Колеса и шины: Покрышки для электросамокатов; Камеры для электросамокатов; Колеса для электросамокатов
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Recreere în aer liber > Scutere pentru grădinărit > Piese pentru trotinete electrice > Roți și anvelope: Anvelope pentru trotinete electrice; Camere de aer pentru trotinete electrice; Roți pentru trotinete electrice
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Exteriérové rekreakčné športy > Kolobežky > Diely E-kolobežiek > Kolesá a pneumatiky: Penumatiky pre e-kolobežky; Duše pre e-kolobežky; Kolesá na e-kolobežky
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Actividades al aire libre > Patinetes > Piezas para patinetes eléctricos > Ruedas y neumáticos: Llantas para scooters eléctricos; Cámaras de aire para scooters eléctricos; Ruedas para scooters eléctricos
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания на открито > Каране на тротинетки > Части за електрически тротинетки > Джанти и гуми: Външни гуми за електрически тротинетки; Вътрешни гуми за електрически тротинетки; Колела за електрически тротинетки
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Açık Hava Etkinlikleri > Scooter Motorlar > E-Scooter Parçaları > Jantlar ve Lastikler: E-scooter lastikleri; E-scooter iç lastikleri; E-scooter tekerlekleri
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Atividades ao ar livre > Motonetas > Peças de patinetes elétricos > Rodas e pneus: Pneus para patinetes elétricos; Câmaras de ar para patinetes elétricos; Rodas para patinetes elétricos
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Outdoorové aktivity > Koloběžky a skútry > Elektroskútry – náhradní díly > Kola a pneumatiky: Pneumatiky na elektrokoloběžky; Duše do elektrokoloběžek; Kolečka na elektrokoloběžky
hu: Sportszerek > Szabadtéri kikapcsolódás > Motoros rollerek > Elektromosroller-alkatrészek > Kerekek és gumik: Elektromos roller gumiabroncsok; Elektromos roller belsők; Elektromos roller kerekek
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Rekreacja na świeżym powietrzu > Hulajnogi > Części do hulajnóg elektrycznych > Koła i opony: Opony do hulajnóg elektrycznych; Dętki do hulajnóg elektrycznych; Koła do hulajnóg elektrycznych
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Poilsis lauke > Paspirtukai > Elektrinių paspirtukų dalys > Ratai ir padangos: Elektrinių paspirtukų padangos; Elektrinio paspirtuko padangų vidinės kameros; Elektrinio paspirtuko ratai
de: Sportartikel > Outdoor-Aktivitäten > Roller > Ersatzteile für E-Scooters > Räder & Reifen: E-Scooter-Reifen; E-Scooter-Schläuche; E-Scooter-Räder
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friluftsliv > Sparkesykler > Deler til el-scootere > Hjul og dekk: Dekk for elsparkesykler; Slanger for elsparkesykler; Hjul for elsparkesykler
sv: Sportartiklar > Utomhusaktiviteter > Skotrar > E-skoterdelar > Hjul och däck: Däck till elscootrar; Slangar till elscootrar; Hjul till elscootrar
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Υπαίθριες δραστηριότητες αναψυχής > Μοτοποδήλατα (Riding Scooters) > Ανταλλακτικά για ηλεκτρικά πατίνια > Ζάντες & ελαστικά: Ελαστικά ηλεκτρικών πατινιών; Σαμπρέλες ηλεκτρικών πατινιών; Τροχοί ηλεκτρικών πατινιών